Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-205
Ancillary business, defined.

Ancillary business shall mean a business owned by a wholesaler, by a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, by a substantial partner of a wholesaler, or by a substantial member of a limited liability company, the primary business of which is directly related to the transporting, storing, or marketing of the brand or brands of beer of a supplier with whom the wholesaler has an agreement, or a business owned by a wholesaler, by a substantial stockholder of a wholesaler, by a substantial partner of a wholesaler, or by a substantial member of a limited liability company which recycles empty beverage containers.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 322.